New Jersey, session 221, A5701.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Commissioner of Transportation shall designate the overpass of Stelton Road at milepost 5.88 on Interstate Highway Route 287 North and on Interstate Highway Route 287 South in the Borough of South Plainfield as the Officer Conklin-Officer Cady Memorial Overpass and shall erect appropriate signs bearing this designation and dedication. 2.    State or other public funds shall not be used for producing, purchasing, or erecting signs bearing the designation established pursuant to section 1 of this act.  The Commissioner of Transportation is authorized to receive gifts, grants, or other financial assistance from private sources for the purpose of funding or reimbursing the Department of Transportation for the costs associated with producing, purchasing, erecting, and maintaining signs bearing the designation established pursuant to section 1 of this act and entering into agreements related thereto, with private sources, including, but not limited to, non-governmental non-profit, educational, or charitable entities or institutions. Work shall not proceed and funding shall not be accepted by the Department of Transportation until an agreement has been reached with a responsible party for paying the costs associated with producing, purchasing, erecting, and maintaining the signs. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.